Nevada, session 83, SB377.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 687B.225 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.225 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.0405, 689A.0412, 689A.0413, 689A.0418, 689A.0437,
689A.044, 689A.0445, 689A.0459, 689B.031, 689B.0312,
689B.0313, 689B.0315, 689B.0317, 689B.0319, 689B.0374,
689B.0378, 689C.1665, 689C.1671, 689C.1675, 689C.1676,
695A.1843, 695A.1856, 695A.1865, 695A.1874, 695B.1912,
695B.1913, 695B.1914, 695B.1919, 695B.19197, 695B.1924,
695B.1925, 695B.1942, 695C.1696, 695C.1699, 695C.1713,
695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743, 695C.1745, 695C.1751,
695G.170, 695G.1705, 695G.171, 695G.1714, 695G.1715,
695G.1719 and 695G.177, and sections 2, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9 and 12 of
this act, any contract for group, blanket or individual health
insurance or any contract by a nonprofit hospital, medical or dental
service corporation or organization for dental care which provides
for payment of a certain part of medical or dental care may require
the insured or member to obtain prior authorization for that care
from the insurer or organization. The insurer or organization shall:
(a) File its procedure for obtaining approval of care pursuant to
this section for approval by the Commissioner; and
(b) Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a specific
statute, including, without limitation, NRS 689A.0446, 689B.0361,
689C.1688, 695A.1859, 695B.19087, 695C.16932 and 695G.1703,
respond to any request for approval by the insured or member
pursuant to this section within 20 days after it receives the request.
2. The procedure for prior authorization may not discriminate
among persons licensed to provide the covered care.
Sec. 2. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance shall include in the policy coverage for at least one
alternative to an opioid that is effective for each purpose for
which:
(a) An opioid is commonly used; and
(b) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. An insurer shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for an alternative to an opioid
if prior authorization would not be required for an opioid under
the same circumstances; or
-
*SB377*

– 3 –
(b) Impose other requirements on an alternative to an opioid
that would not be imposed on an opioid used under the same
circumstances.
3. An insurer shall exempt an insured from any medical
management techniques that would otherwise apply to the benefits
described in subsection 1 if the provider of health care who
prescribes or administers an alternative to an opioid confirms that,
in the professional judgment of the provider of health care, the
alternative to an opioid is appropriate for the treatment of the
patient.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
that conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 3. NRS 689A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.330 If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for
delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance
commissioner or corresponding public officer of that other state has
informed the Commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval
or disapproval by that officer, the Commissioner may by ruling
require that the policy meet the standards set forth in NRS 689A.030
to 689A.320, inclusive [.] , and section 2 of this act.
Sec. 4. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance shall include in the policy coverage for at least one
alternative to an opioid that is effective for each purpose for
which:
(a) An opioid is commonly used; and
(b) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. An insurer shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for an alternative to an opioid
if prior authorization would not be required for an opioid under
the same circumstances; or
-
*SB377*

– 4 –
(b) Impose other requirements on an alternative to an opioid
that would not be imposed on an opioid used under the same
circumstances.
3. An insurer shall exempt an insured from any medical
management techniques that would otherwise apply to the benefits
described in subsection 1 if the provider of health care who
prescribes or administers an alternative to an opioid confirms that,
in the professional judgment of the provider of health care, the
alternative to an opioid is appropriate for the treatment of the
patient.
4. A policy of group health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any
provisions of the policy that conflict with the provisions of this
section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 5. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall
include in the plan coverage for at least one alternative to an
opioid that is effective for each purpose for which:
(a) An opioid is commonly used; and
(b) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. A carrier shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for an alternative to an opioid
if prior authorization would not be required for an opioid under
the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on an alternative to an opioid
that would not be imposed on an opioid used under the same
circumstances.
3. A carrier shall exempt an insured from any medical
management techniques that would otherwise apply to the benefits
described in subsection 1 if the provider of health care who
prescribes or administers an alternative to an opioid confirms that,
in the professional judgment of the provider of health care, the
alternative to an opioid is appropriate for the treatment of the
patient.
-
*SB377*

– 5 –
4. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provisions of the plan that
conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 6. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and section 5 of this act, to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of NRS
687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 7. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall
include in the contract coverage for at least one alternative to an
opioid that is effective for each purpose for which:
(a) An opioid is commonly used; and
(b) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. A society shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for an alternative to an opioid
if prior authorization would not be required for an opioid under
the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on an alternative to an opioid
that would not be imposed on an opioid used under the same
circumstances.
3. A society shall exempt an insured from any medical
management techniques that would otherwise apply to the benefits
described in subsection 1 if the provider of health care who
prescribes or administers an alternative to an opioid confirms that,
in the professional judgment of the provider of health care, the
alternative to an opioid is appropriate for the treatment of the
patient.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
-
*SB377*

– 6 –
required by subsection 1, and any provisions of the contract that
conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 8. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance shall include in the policy
coverage for at least one alternative to an opioid that is effective
for each purpose for which:
(a) An opioid is commonly used; and
(b) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for an alternative to an opioid
if prior authorization would not be required for an opioid under
the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on an alternative to an opioid
that would not be imposed on an opioid used under the same
circumstances.
3. A hospital or medical services corporation shall exempt an
insured from any medical management techniques that would
otherwise apply to the benefits described in subsection 1 if the
provider of health care who prescribes or administers an
alternative to an opioid confirms that, in the professional
judgment of the provider of health care, the alternative to an
opioid is appropriate for the treatment of the patient.
4. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provisions of the
policy that conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*SB377*

– 7 –
Sec. 9. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for at least one
alternative to an opioid that is effective for each purpose for
which:
(a) An opioid is commonly used; and
(b) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. A health maintenance organization shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for an alternative to an opioid
if prior authorization would not be required for an opioid under
the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on an alternative to an opioid
that would not be imposed on an opioid used under the same
circumstances.
3. A health maintenance organization shall exempt an
enrollee from any medical management techniques that would
otherwise apply to the benefits described in subsection 1 if the
provider of health care who prescribes or administers an
alternative to an opioid confirms that, in the professional
judgment of the provider of health care, the alternative to an
opioid is appropriate for the treatment of the patient.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provisions of the plan that
conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 10. NRS 695C.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or
in specific provisions of this title, the provisions of this title are not
applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a
certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not
apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to this title
except with respect to its activities as a health maintenance
organization authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.
2. Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives,
-
*SB377*

– 8 –
must not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to
solicitation or advertising by practitioners of a healing art.
3. Any health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.110, 695C.125, 695C.1691,
695C.1693, 695C.170, 695C.1703, 695C.1705, 695C.1709 to
695C.173, inclusive, 695C.1733, 695C.17335, 695C.1734,
695C.1751, 695C.1755, 695C.1759, 695C.176 to 695C.200,
inclusive, and 695C.265 do not apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or
insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance Program
pursuant to a contract with the Division of Health Care Financing
and Policy of the Department of Health and Human Services. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
5. The provisions of NRS 695C.16932 to 695C.1699,
inclusive, and section 9 of this act, 695C.1701, 695C.1708,
695C.1728, 695C.1731, 695C.17333, 695C.17345, 695C.17347,
695C.1736 to 695C.1745, inclusive, 695C.1757 and 695C.204 apply
to a health maintenance organization that provides health care
services through managed care to recipients of Medicaid under the
State Plan for Medicaid.
6. The provisions of NRS 695C.17095 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to
members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
7. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to:
(a) The officers and employees, and the dependents of officers
and employees, of the governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of this State; or
(b) Members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
 This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 11. NRS 695C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.330 1. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke any
certificate of authority issued to a health maintenance organization
-
*SB377*

– 9 –
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the Commissioner finds
that any of the following conditions exist:
(a) The health maintenance organization is operating
significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document,
its health care plan or in a manner contrary to that described in and
reasonably inferred from any other information submitted pursuant
to NRS 695C.060, 695C.070 and 695C.140, unless any amendments
to those submissions have been filed with and approved by the
Commissioner;
(b) The health maintenance organization issues evidence of
coverage or uses a schedule of charges for health care services
which do not comply with the requirements of NRS 695C.1691 to
695C.200, inclusive, and section 9 of this act, 695C.204 or
695C.207;
(c) The health care plan does not furnish comprehensive health
care services as provided for in NRS 695C.060;
(d) The Commissioner certifies that the health maintenance
organization:
(1) Does not meet the requirements of subsection 1 of NRS
695C.080; or
(2) Is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care
services as required under its health care plan;
(e) The health maintenance organization is no longer financially
responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its
obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;
(f) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect a mechanism affording the enrollees an opportunity to
participate in matters relating to the content of programs pursuant to
NRS 695C.110;
(g) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect the system required by NRS 695C.260 for:
(1) Resolving complaints in a manner reasonably to dispose
of valid complaints; and
(2) Conducting external reviews of adverse determinations
that comply with the provisions of NRS 695G.241 to 695G.310,
inclusive;
(h) The health maintenance organization or any person on its
behalf has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue,
misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive or unfair manner;
(i) The continued operation of the health maintenance
organization would be hazardous to its enrollees or creditors or to
the general public;
(j) The health maintenance organization fails to provide the
coverage required by NRS 695C.1691; or
-
*SB377*

– 10 –
(k) The health maintenance organization has otherwise failed to
comply substantially with the provisions of this chapter.
2. A certificate of authority must be suspended or revoked only
after compliance with the requirements of NRS 695C.340.
3. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization shall
not, during the period of that suspension, enroll any additional
groups or new individual contracts, unless those groups or persons
were contracted for before the date of suspension.
4. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is revoked, the organization shall proceed, immediately
following the effective date of the order of revocation, to wind up its
affairs and shall conduct no further business except as may be
essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of the organization.
It shall engage in no further advertising or solicitation of any kind.
The Commissioner may, by written order, permit such further
operation of the organization as the Commissioner may find to be in
the best interest of enrollees to the end that enrollees are afforded
the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing coverage for
health care.
Sec. 12. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan shall include in the plan coverage for at least one
alternative to an opioid that is effective for each purpose for
which:
(a) An opioid is commonly used; and
(b) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. A managed care organization shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for an alternative to an opioid
if prior authorization would not be required for an opioid under
the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on an alternative to an opioid
that would not be imposed on an opioid used under the same
circumstances.
3. A managed care organization shall exempt an insured
from any medical management techniques that would otherwise
apply to the benefits described in subsection 1 if the provider of
health care who prescribes or administers an alternative to an
opioid confirms that, in the professional judgment of the provider
of health care, the alternative to an opioid is appropriate for the
treatment of the patient.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
-
*SB377*

– 11 –
required by subsection 1, and any provisions of the plan that
conflict with the provisions of this section is void.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which
is used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the
use of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 13. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
-
*SB377*

– 12 –
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.408, 687B.692, 687B.723,
687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to 689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6
and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033 to 689B.0369, inclusive,
689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive, 689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287
and 689B.500 , and section 4 of this act apply to coverage provided
pursuant to this paragraph, except that the provisions of NRS
689B.0378, 689B.03785 and 689B.500 only apply to coverage for
active officers and employees of the governing body, or the
dependents of such officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
-
*SB377*

– 13 –
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 14. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.409,
687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255,
695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to
695G.174, inclusive, and section 12 of this act, 695G.176,
695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241 to
695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405 and 695G.415, in the same manner
as an insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required
to comply with those provisions.
Sec. 15. NRS 422.4025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.4025 1. The Department shall:
(a) By regulation, develop a list of preferred prescription drugs
to be used for the Medicaid program and the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, and each public or nonprofit health benefit plan
that elects to use the list of preferred prescription drugs as its
formulary pursuant to NRS 287.012, 287.0433 or 687B.407; and
(b) Negotiate and enter into agreements to purchase the drugs
included on the list of preferred prescription drugs on behalf of the
health benefit plans described in paragraph (a) or enter into a
contract pursuant to NRS 422.4053 with a pharmacy benefit
manager, health maintenance organization or one or more public or
private entities in this State, the District of Columbia or other states
or territories of the United States, as appropriate, to negotiate such
agreements.
2. The Department shall, by regulation, establish a list of
prescription drugs which must be excluded from any restrictions that
are imposed by the Medicaid program on drugs that are on the list of
preferred prescription drugs established pursuant to subsection 1.
-
*SB377*

– 14 –
The list established pursuant to this subsection must include,
without limitation:
(a) Prescription drugs that are prescribed for the treatment of the
human immunodeficiency virus, including, without limitation,
antiretroviral medications;
(b) Antirejection medications for organ transplants;
(c) Antihemophilic medications; and
(d) Any prescription drug which the Board identifies as
appropriate for exclusion from any restrictions that are imposed by
the Medicaid program on drugs that are on the list of preferred
prescription drugs.
3. The regulations must provide that the Board makes the final
determination of:
(a) Whether a class of therapeutic prescription drugs is included
on the list of preferred prescription drugs and is excluded from any
restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid program on drugs that
are on the list of preferred prescription drugs;
(b) Which therapeutically equivalent prescription drugs will be
reviewed for inclusion on the list of preferred prescription drugs and
for exclusion from any restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid
program on drugs that are on the list of preferred prescription drugs;
and
(c) Which prescription drugs should be excluded from any
restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid program on drugs that
are on the list of preferred prescription drugs based on continuity of
care concerning a specific diagnosis, condition, class of therapeutic
prescription drugs or medical specialty.
4. The list of preferred prescription drugs established pursuant
to subsection 1 must include, without limitation:
(a) Any prescription drug determined by the Board to be
essential for treating sickle cell disease and its variants; [and]
(b) Prescription drugs to prevent the acquisition of human
immunodeficiency virus [.] ; and
(c) Alternatives to opioids for purposes for which opioids
would normally be used.
5. The regulations must provide that each new pharmaceutical
product and each existing pharmaceutical product for which there is
new clinical evidence supporting its inclusion on the list of preferred
prescription drugs must be made available pursuant to the Medicaid
program with prior authorization until the Board reviews the product
or the evidence.
6. The Medicaid program must cover a prescription drug that is
not included on the list of preferred prescription drugs as if the drug
were included on that list if:
(a) The drug is:
-
*SB377*

– 15 –
(1) Used to treat hepatitis C;
(2) Used to provide medication-assisted treatment for opioid
use disorder;
(3) Used to support safe withdrawal from substance use
disorder; or
(4) In the same class as a drug on the list of preferred
prescription drugs; and
(b) All preferred prescription drugs within the same class as the
drug are unsuitable for a recipient of Medicaid because:
(1) The recipient is allergic to all preferred prescription drugs
within the same class as the drug;
(2) All preferred prescription drugs within the same class as
the drug are contraindicated for the recipient or are likely to interact
in a harmful manner with another drug that the recipient is taking;
(3) The recipient has a history of adverse reactions to all
preferred prescription drugs within the same class as the drug; or
(4) The drug has a unique indication that is supported by
peer-reviewed clinical evidence or approved by the United States
Food and Drug Administration.
7. The Medicaid program must automatically cover any typical
or atypical antipsychotic medication or anticonvulsant medication
that is not on the list of preferred prescription drugs upon the
demonstrated therapeutic failure of one drug on that list to
adequately treat the condition of a recipient of Medicaid.
8. On or before February 1 of each year, the Department shall:
(a) Compile a report concerning the agreements negotiated
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 and contracts entered into
pursuant to NRS 422.4053 which must include, without limitation,
the financial effects of obtaining prescription drugs through those
agreements and contracts, in total and aggregated separately for
agreements negotiated by the Department, contracts with a
pharmacy benefit manager, contracts with a health maintenance
organization and contracts with public and private entities from this
State, the District of Columbia and other states and territories of the
United States; and
(b) Post the report on an Internet website maintained by the
Department and submit the report to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In odd-numbered years, the Legislature; or
(2) In even-numbered years, the Legislative Commission.
Sec. 16. NRS 422.403 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.403 1. The Department shall, by regulation, establish and
manage the use by the Medicaid program of step therapy and prior
authorization for prescription drugs.
2. The Drug Use Review Board shall:
-
*SB377*

– 16 –
(a) Advise the Department concerning the use by the Medicaid
program of step therapy and prior authorization for prescription
drugs;
(b) Develop step therapy protocols and prior authorization
policies and procedures for use by the Medicaid program for
prescription drugs; and
(c) Review and approve, based on clinical evidence and best
clinical practice guidelines and without consideration of the cost of
the prescription drugs being considered, step therapy protocols used
by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
3. The step therapy protocol established pursuant to this section
must not apply to [a] :
(a) A drug approved by the Food and Drug Administration that
is prescribed to treat a psychiatric condition of a recipient of
Medicaid, if:
[(a)] (1) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
[(b)] (2) The drug is prescribed by:
[(1)] (I) A psychiatrist;
[(2)] (II) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
[(3)] (III) An advanced practice registered nurse who has
the psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State
Board of Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
[(4)] (IV) A primary care provider that is providing care to
an insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in [subparagraph
(1), (2) or (3),] sub-subparagraph (I), (II) or (III), if the closest
practitioner listed in [subparagraph (1), (2) or (3)] sub-
subparagraph (I), (II) or (III) who participates in Medicaid is
located 60 miles or more from the residence of the recipient; and
[(c)] (3) The practitioner listed in [paragraph (b)] subparagraph
(1) who prescribed the drug knows, based on the medical history of
the recipient, or reasonably expects each alternative drug that is
required to be used earlier in the step therapy protocol to be
ineffective at treating the psychiatric condition.
(b) A drug that is an alternative to an opioid, if the provider of
health care who prescribes or administers such a drug to a
recipient of Medicaid confirms that, in the professional judgment
of the provider of health care, the drug is appropriate for the
treatment of the recipient.
4. The Department shall not require the Drug Use Review
Board to develop, review or approve prior authorization policies or
-
*SB377*

– 17 –
procedures necessary for the operation of the list of preferred
prescription drugs developed pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
5. The Department shall accept recommendations from the
Drug Use Review Board as the basis for developing or revising step
therapy protocols and prior authorization policies and procedures
used by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(c) “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires a
recipient of Medicaid to use a prescription drug or sequence of
prescription drugs other than a drug that a practitioner recommends
for treatment of a [psychiatric] condition of the recipient before
Medicaid provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 17. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 18. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 17, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB377*